Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1817.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

HB1817 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

The Legislature finds that Oklahoma's groundwater resources face
critical threats from depletion and contamination due to unqualified
workers and improper water access practices. There is a nationwide
geoscience workforce shortage projected by the United States
Department of Labor to peak at 130,000 workers by 2029, leaving
Oklahoma's groundwater industry struggling to fill positions with
adequately trained professionals. The growing reliance on untrained
workers in the groundwater industry jeopardizes the safety of homes,
businesses, and communities and accelerates the degradation of these
essential water resources. Immediate action is needed to protect
these vital water resources and to equip the groundwater workforce
with the skills necessary to ensure sustainable water management
practices.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1020.16a of Title 82, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Water Resources Board
Well Driller and Pump Installer Program. The Program shall be
administered by the Board and shall have the following duties:
1. License well drilling and pump installation professionals to
ensure the integrity of well construction, and that those
professionals are meeting construction standards to prevent
pollution of groundwater in Oklahoma;

HB1817 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Develop comprehensive standards and rules in cooperation
with the Well Driller and Pump Installer Advisory Council, the
Oklahoma Ground Water Association, and public stakeholders;
3. Provide for training and outreach for licensed well drillers
and pump installers;
4. Provide technical assistance to the public regarding
groundwater and well construction; and
5. Focus on funding and supporting the development and
expansion of a groundwater professional training program at an
accredited Tier 1 research institution of higher education in
Oklahoma.
B. The groundwater professional training program shall:
1. Support and expand an existing groundwater professional
training program established by the National Ground Water
Association;
2. Provide specialized education and skills-based micro-
credentials for both current and future groundwater professionals,
including water well drillers, pump installers, plumbers, and heavy
equipment operators; and
3. Partner with state and national industry leaders to ensure
workforce training is conducted using cutting-edge, industry-
approved methods.
C. The Board shall:

HB1817 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. Identify and establish a formal partnership with a
qualifying institution of higher education in Oklahoma;
2. Provide funding for the program from the Oklahoma Water
Resources Board Well Driller and Pump Installer Program Revolving
Fund established in Section 3 of this act;
3. Provide technical assistance and other support to the
institution to enhance the training program;
4. Work with industry stakeholders to ensure alignment of the
program with current and future workforce demands;
5. Oversee the implementation, evaluation, and continuous
improvement of the Program; and
6. Report annually to the Governor and the Legislature on the
Program's progress and outcomes.
D. To implement the Program, the Board shall partner with and
provide funding for the Program to an accredited institution of
higher education in this state that is:
1. A Tier 1 research institution of higher education in
Oklahoma to ensure access to specialized subject matter experts in
groundwater, as well as access to advanced research facilities and
modern approaches to solving real-world problems in groundwater
aquifer access. The institution shall have active community
engagement and outreach to ensure both school-aged children and
public populations are made aware of the critical occupations
needed;
HB1817 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. An institution that has an existing memoranda of
understanding with state groundwater industry partners to ensure
programming is created with industry-approved skills and outcomes;
3. An institution that has existing, or in-planning,
opportunities for both university students and nonstudent
populations to earn micro-credentials to showcase their achievement
of industry-aligned skills;
4. An institution with a demonstrated history of developing
groundwater workforce professionals, and the expertise necessary to
produce high-quality training in groundwater and water quality
subject areas;
5. Capable of providing training that has been created by
individuals specializing in best practices in both online and in-
person education for working professionals and have assessments for
both program effectiveness and participant satisfaction; and
6. Capable of providing training that is flexible to meet the
needs of the current and future workforce.
E. The Board is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1020.16b of Title 82, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Water Resources Board to be designated the
HB1817 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

"Okl ahoma Water Resources Board Well Driller and Pump Installer
Program Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not
subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies
deposited to the credit of the fund by law. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted
and expended by the Oklahoma Water Resources Board for the purpose
of administering the Oklahoma Water Resources Board Well Driller and
Pump Installer Program established in Section 2 of this act.
Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the
State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.









HB1817 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.